Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.085

Inheritance by adopted child.

A lawfully adopted child shall not be considered an "heir" of his or her natural parents for purposes of this title.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2004; 1965 c 145 s 11.04.085.]

NOTES:

Effect of decree of adoption: RCW 26.33.260.

"Issue" includes lawfully adopted children: RCW 11.02.005(11).